Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-581 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Every health care provider in this state may conduct
pediatric screenings for type 1 diabetes in accordance with accepted
medical practices and subject to the informed consent of the child’s
parent or legal guardian.
B. The screenings described in subsection A of this section
shall be reimbursable under the state Medicaid program, subject to
receipt of any necessary federal approval and in accordance with
rules promulgated by the Oklahoma Health Care Authority Board.
C. The State Department of Health shall seek grants and other
funding opportunities to support the provision of pediatric

screenings for type 1 diabetes as described in subsection A of this
section.
D. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority Board shall promulgate
rules necessary to implement subsection B of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1427 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 25th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1427 Page 3